California, session 20252026, AB1079.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Since the enactment of the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 14025) of Division 14 of the Elections Code), hundreds of cities, school districts, community college districts, and special districts have adopted district-based elections, and still many others had already employed district-based elections.(2) The vote dilution of at-large elections combated by the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) and the California Voting Rights Act of 2001, as well as the gerrymandering of electoral districts combated by the FAIR MAPS Act of 2023 (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100) of Division 21 of the Elections Code), are unacceptable harms to the electorate and our democracy that are impossible to fully repair after an election is conducted using an election system in violation of one or more of these laws.(3) At-large elections may operate to dilute minority votes and result in unresponsiveness of elected officials to the needs of minority communities.(4) Under current law, enforcement of an order or judgment implementing appropriate remedies under the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 or modifying election districts under the FAIR MAPS Act of 2023 may be stayed by the filing of an appeal of that order or judgment, thus forestalling effective relief to minority communities.(5) The prompt implementation of district-based elections to comply with the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 or adjustments in election district boundaries to comply with the FAIR MAPS Act 2023 may be ordered by a Superior Court of competent jurisdiction to protect the right to vote, the equal protection of the laws, and the integrity of the electoral process.(6) The dilution of votes of a protected class in elections for the governing boards of political subdivisions is a matter of statewide concern.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that remedial measures ordered by a Superior Court to address violations of the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 or the FAIR MAPS Act of 2023 are implemented promptly regardless of any pending appeal, except where the Superior Court determines that such prompt implementation is antithetical to the California Voting Rights Act of 2001, the FAIR MAPS Act of 2023, or the orderly administration of the state’s elections.SEC. 2. Section 916 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:916. (a) Except as provided in Sections 917.1 to 917.10, inclusive, and in Section 116.810, the perfecting of an appeal stays proceedings in the trial court upon the judgment or order appealed from or upon the matters embraced therein or affected thereby, including enforcement of the judgment or order, but the trial court may proceed upon any other matter embraced in the action and not affected by the judgment or order.(b) When there is a stay of proceedings other than the enforcement of the judgment, the trial court shall have jurisdiction of proceedings related to the enforcement of the judgment as well as any other matter embraced in the action and not affected by the judgment or order appealed from.SEC. 3. Section 917.10 is added to the Code of Civil Procedure, immediately following Section 917.9, to read:917.10. (a) The perfecting of an appeal shall not stay enforcement of the judgment or order in the trial court, in the absence of an order of the trial court providing otherwise, under any of the following circumstances:(1) If the trial court has found that a party’s at-large method of election, as that term is defined in Section 14026 of the Elections Code, violates, or is likely to violate, the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 14025) of Division 14 of the Elections Code).(2) If the trial court has found that a party’s election district boundaries violate, or are likely to violate, the Fair And Inclusive Redistricting for Municipalities And Political Subdivisions (FAIR MAPS) Act of 2023 (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100) of Division 21 of the Elections Code).(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), enforcement of a judgment or order in the trial court may be stayed upon the perfection of the appeal if the Secretary of State files a certification in the trial court declaring that staying enforcement of a judgment or order pending appeal is necessary for the orderly administration of the state’s elections.(c) This section does not limit the power of a reviewing court to issue a stay or grant a writ of supersedeas in accordance with Section 923.(d) If the enforcement of a judgment or order is not stayed pursuant to subdivision (a), the party whose at-large method of election that the trial court found violates, or is likely to violate, the California Voting Rights Act of 2001, or the party whose election district boundaries that the trial court found violate, or are likely to violate, the Fair And Inclusive Redistricting for Municipalities And Political Subdivisions (FAIR MAPS) Act of 2023, shall reimburse a county elections official for any actual costs incurred by that elections official in administering elections as a result of the enforcement of the trial court’s judgment or order, and as the result of any orders issued by a court during an appeal of the action.(e) This section does not apply to a judgment or order entered in a proceeding or action commenced on or before January 1, 2026, that asserts at least one cause of action under the California Voting Rights Act of 2001 or the FAIR MAPS Act of 2023.